Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7886.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-37.4. Electric and gas meter reading required quarterly.
(a) Every electric and natural gas distribution public entity shall read, record and update
utility billing on a monthly scheduled interval. Bills shall be forwarded within fourteen (14) days
of the scheduled record.
(b) A utility company which estimates bills shall file with the Public Utility Commission
(PUC) a statement of their formula used in preparing estimated bills. The PUC has the discretion
to approve, reject or modify the proposed formula. Any amendments to the formula shall be
subjected to the PUC for review and approval.
(c) Estimated bills for ratepayers shall consist of charges for utility services calculated in
accordance with the formula approved by the PUC.
(d) Estimated bills shall be submitted to ratepayers for months when the quarterly reading
is not scheduled or conducted.
(e) In the event the utility fails to read the meter on a quarterly basis, they shall not demand,
collect, or require payment of any balance in excess of the amount required by the prior estimated
monthly bills.
(f) Any amount otherwise due for use in excess of the estimated monthly bill shall be

forfeited for any period in which the electric or natural gas distribution utility failed to read the
ratepayer’s meter.
(g) Meter reading conducted by the utility company shall not be passed on to ratepayers.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026
========
LC005723
========
LC005723 - Page 2 of 3